apertium-ca-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="pa/rere__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>remmo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>revate</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rvi</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>revi</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>reste</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>resti</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rver</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rremmo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rvero</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iate</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>reste</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrei</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rve</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>riate</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rreste</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rresti</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrebber</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ion</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrebbero</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rer</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrebbe</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iono</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rremo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rere</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rse</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rsi</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rsa</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrò</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ia</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrete</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rso</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrai</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ian</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rran</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rranno</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rrà</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>revamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>revo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ressi</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>resser</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>riamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ressero</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>resse</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>revan</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>riamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>revano</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rendo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>reva</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ia</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>riamo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>io</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rete</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ressimo</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rete</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iano</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ri</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ressi</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ri</l> 
        <r>rere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>

    <e lm="parere">
        <i>pa</i> 
        <par n="pa/rere__vblex" /> 
    </e>
